Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2646.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2154(b)(1) of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:Section 2154. Medical policies and clinical review criteria.* * *(b) Clinical review criteria.--(1) Clinical review criteria adopted by an insurer or MA or CHIP managed care plan shall, at the time of medical 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 policy development or review:* * *(v) Not exclude, restrict or delay coverage of a prescription drug solely on the basis that the drug was approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration pursuant to 21 U.S.C. § 356(c) (relating to expedited approval of drugs for serious or life-threatening diseases or conditions).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2646PN3642 - 2 - 12345678910